Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201284-1218
Local
agencies; preservation of records; administrator; advise and assist;
rules and regulations.

The governing bodies of all local agencies in this state,
with the advice and assistance of the administrator and pursuant to the rules
and regulations adopted
and promulgated pursuant to the Records Management Act, shall
establish and maintain continuing programs to promote the principles of efficient
records management for local records and
for the selection and preservation of essential local records, which programs,
insofar as practicable, shall follow the patterns of the programs established
for state records as provided in the
act. Each such governing body shall promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary
or proper to effectuate and implement the programs so established, but nothing
therein shall be in violation of the provisions of general law relating to
the destruction of local records.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 18, p. 1393;

Laws 1969, c. 841, § 14, p. 3176;

Laws 1979, LB 559, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 25.
July 19, 2012